Tennessee, session 114, SB2536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-36-212(a)(5), is amended by
adding the following language immediately after the language "and not the state":
. A governing body of a political subdivision passing a resolution pursuant to this
subdivision (a)(5) shall forward a copy of the resolution to the board of trustees.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2536
011913
- 1 -